District of Columbia statutes.
10-1601.34

Development rights.

(a)

The District government, or one of its instrumentalities, such as the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation, shall control development rights on the north side of the Ballpark Site and all but 210,000 square feet of development rights reserved for the MLB Team purposes on the south side of the Ballpark Site. Development on the east side of the Ballpark Site, on First Street, S.E., shall generate revenue to the District and shall be developed in accordance with a plan approved by the Council.

(b)

Any excess revenues derived from development rights that are not used for cost overruns for land acquisition and environmental remediation shall be deposited into the Community Benefits Fund established by § 10-1602.02.

Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-22, § 5, 54 DCR 8006
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Ballpark Hard and Soft Costs Cap and Ballpark Lease Conditional Approval Temporary Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-115, June 9, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5353).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 5 of Ballpark Hard and Soft Costs Cap Temporary Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-1, April 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 6580).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Ballpark Hard and Soft Costs Cap and Ballpark Lease Conditional Approval Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-378, May 19, 2006, 53 DCR 4399).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Ballpark Hard and Soft Costs Cap Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-11, January 26, 2007, 54 DCR 1514).